Maryland, session 2025, HB0195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
3–107.
(a) [Whether] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, WHETHER or
not the defendant is confined [and unless the State petitions the court for extraordinary
cause to extend the time], the court shall dismiss the charge against a defendant found
incompetent to stand trial under this subtitle:
(1) WHEN CHARGED WITH MURDER IN THE FIRST DEGREE IN
VIOLATION OF § 2–201 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE OR RAPE IN THE FIRST
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0195*

HOUSE BILL 195
DEGREE IN VIOLATION OF § 3–303 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE, AFTER THE
LESSER OF THE EXPIRATION OF 10 YEARS OR THE MAXIMUM SENTENCE FOR THE
MOST SERIOUS OFFENSE CHARGED;
(2) when charged with a felony or a crime of violence as defined under §
14–101 of the Criminal Law Article NOT COVERED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, after the lesser of the expiration of 5 years or the maximum sentence for the
most serious offense charged; or
[(2)] (3) when charged with an offense not covered under item (1) OR (2)
of this subsection, after the lesser of the expiration of 3 years or the maximum sentence for
the most serious offense charged.
(B) (1) AS PART OF THE PROCESS OF THE COURT DISMISSING A CHARGE,
THE COURT SHALL PROVIDE THE STATE’S ATTORNEY AND A VICTIM OR VICTIM’S
REPRESENTATIVE WHO HAS FILED A NOTIFICATION REQUEST FORM UNDER §
11–104 OF THIS ARTICLE ADVANCE NOTICE OF THE DISMISSAL AND AN
OPPORTUNITY TO BE HEARD.
(2) AT ANY TIME, THE STATE MAY PETITION THE COURT FOR
EXTRAORDINARY CAUSE TO EXTEND THE TIME OF THE CHARGE.
[(b)] (C) Whether or not the defendant is confined, if the court considers that
resuming the criminal proceeding would be unjust because so much time has passed since
the defendant was found incompetent to stand trial, the court shall dismiss the charge
without prejudice. However, the court may not dismiss a charge without providing the
State’s Attorney and a victim or victim’s representative who has requested notification
under § 3–123(c) of this title advance notice and an opportunity to be heard.
[(c)] (D) If charges are dismissed under this section, the court shall notify:
(1) the victim of the crime charged or the victim’s representative who has
requested notification under § 3–123(c) of this title; and
(2) the Criminal Justice Information System Central Repository.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.